Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.16
Factory branch, defined.

Factory branch means a branch office
maintained in this state by a person who manufactures, assembles, or distributes
motor vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers for the sale of such motor vehicles,
motorcycles, or trailers to distributors or dealers or for directing or supervising,
in whole or in part, its representatives in this state.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 28.